Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1825
Committee;
subrogation rights.

When an order for the payment
of compensation for personal injury or death is made from the Victim's Compensation Fund, the committee
shall be subrogated to the cause of action of the applicant against the person
responsible for the injury or death and shall be entitled to bring an action
against such person for the amount of the damages sustained by the applicant.
If an amount greater than that paid under the order is recovered and collected
in the action, the committee shall pay the balance to the applicant.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 25;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 26;

Laws 2009, LB598, § 11.